Hawaii statutes.
H.
Advertisements

§11-391 Advertisements. (a)
Any advertisement that is broadcast, televised, circulated, published,
distributed, or otherwise communicated, including by electronic means, shall:

(1) Contain the name and address of the candidate,
candidate committee, noncandidate committee, or other person paying for the
advertisement;

(2) Contain a notice in a prominent location stating
either that:

(A) The advertisement has the approval and
authority of the candidate; provided that an advertisement paid for by a
candidate, candidate committee, or ballot issue committee does not need to
include the notice; or

(B) The advertisement has not been approved by
the candidate; and

(3) Not contain false information about the time,
date, place, or means of voting.

(b) The fine for violation of this section, if
assessed by the commission, shall not exceed $25 for each advertisement that
lacks the information required by this section or provides prohibited
information, and shall not exceed an aggregate amount of $5,000. [L 2010, c
211, pt of §2; am L 2013, c 112, §10; am L 2014, c 128, §§2, 4]

Case Notes

Plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor
had standing to challenge the "advertising" disclaimer requirements
in subsection (a)(2)(B); first, even if plaintiff had already published
advertisements with the disclaimers, it did not mean that it faced no injury;
second, plaintiff sought a declaration that it need not include disclaimers in
the future and challenged those statutes facially; third, plaintiff did not
have to publish the advertisements without the disclaimers to have standing;
finally, a favorable ruling would have enabled plaintiff to publish its
advertisements without the disclaimers and fear of violating the law. 872 F. Supp.
2d 1023 (2012).

Plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor's
as-applied challenge to the disclaimer requirement in subsection (a)(2)(B) and
the corresponding definition of "advertisement" in §11-302, which
included the "electioneering communications" definitions in
§11-341(c), rejected; the court concluded that the plaintiff's advertisements
fit within the regulatory "safe harbor"--they were an "advertisement"
that was an "electioneering communication" and was the functional
equivalent of express advocacy under §11-341(c). 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023 (2012).

Plaintiff noncandidate committee and government contractor's
facial challenge to the disclaimer requirement in subsection (a)(2)(B) failed;
disclosure requirements could apply to issue advocacy, so long as the exacting
scrutiny test was otherwise met, and disclosure and disclaimer
requirements--such as requiring a disclaimer under federal law that a
communication "was not authorized by any candidate or candidate's
committee"--satisfied the exacting scrutiny test; in effect, the U.S.
Supreme Court in "Citizens United had effectively disposed of any attack
on ... attribution and disclaimer requirements". 872 F. Supp. 2d 1023
(2012).

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next